North Carolina statutes. Chapter 126. North Carolina Human Resources Act.
Article 3. Local Discretion as to Local Government Employees.

§ 126-9.
County or municipal employees may be made subject to rules adopted by local governing body.

When a board of county commissioners adopts rules and regulations governing annual leave, sick leave, hours of work, holidays, and the administration of the pay plan for county employees generally and the county rules and regulations are filed with the Director of the Office of State Human Resources, the county rules will supersede the rules adopted by the State Human Resources Commission as to the county employees otherwise subject to the provisions of this Chapter.

No county employees otherwise subject to the provisions of this Chapter may be paid a salary less than the minimum nor more than the maximum of the applicable salary range adopted in accordance with this Chapter without approval of the State Human Resources Commission. Provided, however, that subject to the approval of the State Human Resources Commission, a board of county commissioners may adjust the salary ranges applicable to employees who are otherwise subject to the provisions of this Chapter, in order to cause the level of pay to conform to local financial ability and fiscal policy. The State Human Resources Commission shall adopt policies and regulations to ensure that significant relationships within the schedule of salary ranges are maintained.

When two or more counties are combined into a district for the performance of an activity whose employees are subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the boards of county commissioners of the counties may jointly exercise the authority hereinabove granted in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

When a municipality is performing an activity by or through employees which are subject to the provisions of this Chapter, the governing body of the municipality may exercise the authority hereinabove granted in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

History.

1965, c. 640, s. 2; 1975, c. 667, s. 2; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-10.
Personnel services to local governmental units.

The State Human Resources Commission may make the services and facilities of the Office of State Human Resources available upon request to the political subdivisions of the State. The State Human Resources Commission may establish reasonable charges for the service and facilities so provided, and all funds so derived shall be deposited in the State treasury to the credit of the general fund.

History.

1965, c. 640, s. 2; 1975, c. 667, ss. 2, 12; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 126-11.
Local personnel system may be established; approval and monitoring; rules and regulations.

The board of county commissioners of any county may establish and maintain a personnel system for all employees of the county subject to its jurisdiction, which system and any substantial changes to the system, shall be approved by the State Human Resources Commission as substantially equivalent to the standards established under this Chapter for employees of local departments of social services, local health departments, and area mental health programs, local emergency management programs. If approved by the State Human Resources Commission, the employees covered by the county system shall be exempt from all provisions of this Chapter except Article 6.

(a1)

With approval of each of the boards of commissioners of the county or counties which comprise the area mental health authority, the area mental health authority
may establish and maintain a personnel system for all employees of the area mental health authority, which system and any substantial changes to the system, shall be equivalent to the standards established under this Chapter for employees of area mental health authorities.
If approved by the State Human Resources Commission, the employees covered by the area mental health authority system shall be exempt from all provisions of this Chapter except Article 6.

A board of county commissioners may petition the State Human Resources Commission to determine whether any portion of its total personnel system meets the requirements in (a) above. Upon such determination, county employees shall be exempt from the provisions of this Chapter relating to the approved portions of the county personnel system.

(b1)

The board of an area mental health authority, with the approval of each of the boards of commissioners of the county or counties which comprise the area mental health authority, may petition the State Human Resources Commission to determine whether any portion of its total personnel system meets the requirements in subsection (a1) above.
Upon such determination, area mental health authority employees shall be exempt from the provisions of this Chapter relating to the approved portions of the area mental health authority personnel system except as provided in

G.S. 122C-121

.

The Office of State Human Resources shall monitor at least annually county or area mental health authority personnel systems approved under this section in order to ensure compliance.

In order to define “substantially equivalent,” the State Human Resources Commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to implement the federal merit system standards and these regulations at a minimum shall include: recruitment and selection of employees; position classification; pay administration; training; employee relations; equal employment opportunity; and records and reports.

History.

1965, c. 640, s. 2; 1975, c. 667, s. 2; 1983, c. 674, s. 1; 1991, c. 65, s. 5; c. 564, s. 1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).